Washington statutes.
RCW 35.51.9001

Authority supplemental—1997 c 426.

The authority granted by RCW 35.51.050 is supplemental and in addition to the authority granted by Title 35 RCW and to any other authority granted to cities, towns, or municipal corporations to levy, pledge, and apply special assessments.

[ 1997 c 426 s 5.]